Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 9
LOCAL GOVERNMENT INVESTMENT
POOL TRUST FUND ADMINISTRATION
AND ENFORCEMENT ACT

11-51-901. Short title.

This part 9 shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Investment Pool Trust Fund Administration and Enforcement Act".

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 327, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-902. General powers of securities commissioner.

The securities commissioner is hereby empowered to administer and enforce the provisions of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and all the provisions of this part 9.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 327, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-903. Interests in local government investment pool trust fund.

For the purposes of this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

The interest of a participating local government in a local government investment pool trust fund is a "security", as defined by section 11-51-201 (17); and

The solicitation of a local government to participate in a local government investment pool trust fund constitutes an "offer" to sell a security, as defined by section 11-51-201 (13)(c), by the trust fund to the local government, and the consummation of an agreement to participate in a local government investment pool trust fund constitutes a "sale" of a security, as defined by section 11-51-201 (13)(a), by the trust fund to the local government.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 327, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-904. Requirement for registration of local government investment pools.

It is unlawful for the board of trustees of any local government investment pool trust fund to permit the investment of trust fund assets unless the trust fund is registered with the securities commissioner under this part 9.

It is unlawful for a local government to participate in a local government investment pool trust fund unless the trust fund is registered with the securities commissioner under this part 9.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 328, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-905. General registration requirements.

A local government investment pool trust fund shall register with the securities commissioner under this part 9 by filing a notice, in such form as prescribed by the securities commissioner, and a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to section 24-75-703, C.R.S.

Any local government investment pool trust fund organized pursuant to the provisions of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 1993, shall register with the securities commissioner under this part 9 by filing a notice, in such form as prescribed by the securities commissioner, and the resolution adopted pursuant to the provisions of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 1993, no later than thirty days after July 1, 1993.

The information to be provided to the securities commissioner by a local government investment pool trust fund in the notice for registration shall include, but need not be limited to:

The name and address of the trust fund;

The name and address of the administrator of the trust fund;

The name and address of each of the custodians of the assets of the trust fund;

The name and address of each of the investment advisers of the trust fund and each of the financial institutions acting in an advisory capacity for the trust fund;

Identification of each participating local government in the trust fund; and

The total assets of the trust fund as of the date of filing.

Every filing of the notice and resolution required under this section shall be accompanied by a fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707; except that no such registration fee shall be more than five thousand dollars.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 328, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-906. Reports to securities commissioner.

A local government investment pool trust fund shall inform the securities commissioner of any material change regarding the administrator, investment adviser, broker-dealer, or financial institution acting in an advisory capacity, or custodian of the trust fund within ten days of such change.

The board of trustees of a local government investment pool trust fund shall file quarterly reports with the securities commissioner in the form prescribed by the securities commissioner.

Such reports shall demonstrate that the trust fund is in full compliance with the provisions of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as amended.

The information to be provided in such quarterly reports may include, but need not be limited to:

The identity of the participating local governments;

The amount of participation of each such participating local government; and

The total assets of the trust fund.

In addition to the quarterly reports required in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the securities commissioner may, by rule or order, require the board of trustees of a local government investment pool trust fund to file such other periodic reports with the securities commissioner as are necessary to demonstrate that the trust fund is in full compliance with the provisions of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as amended.

The financial statements of a local government investment pool trust fund shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles except as the securities commissioner may otherwise provide by rule or order.

A local government investment pool trust fund shall file with the securities commissioner an annual audit of the trust fund to be completed at least annually, but at intervals of not more than fifteen months, performed by an independent certified public accountant.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, provide that such audits include safeguards to ensure that they adequately describe the financial condition of the trust fund.

Such audit shall be completed and submitted to the securities commissioner within the time lines the securities commissioner by rule or order prescribes.

Such audit shall include, but need not be limited to, the following information:

The name and address of each custodian holding or which at any time since the last annual audit held any assets of the trust fund;

The amount and description of the assets of the trust fund on deposit with or otherwise in the custody of each such custodian; and

Any other information the securities commissioner prescribes by rule or order.

Every filing of the annual audit required under this subsection (4) shall be accompanied by a fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707; except that no such annual fee shall be more than two thousand dollars.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 329, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-907. Access to records.

The securities commissioner, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances, may examine, without notice, any accounts held by a custodian on behalf of a local government investment pool trust fund and all books, records, and papers pertaining thereto, and all accounts, books, records, and papers pertaining thereto, within or without this state, in the possession of any administrator, the board of trustees, any investment adviser of or broker-dealer or financial institution acting in an advisory capacity to the trust fund, any person employed by or directly associated with such broker-dealer or financial institution in connection with providing such advisory services, or any investment adviser representative.

The securities commissioner, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances, may copy, or cause to be copied, or request from and shall receive copies of such documents as are made and maintained by the custodians, administrator, board of trustees, investment adviser of or broker-dealer or financial institution acting in advisory capacity to the trust fund, any person employed by or directly associated with such broker-dealer or financial institution in connection with providing such advisory services, or any investment advisor representative in connection with a local government investment pool trust fund in the normal course of business, at the expense of such person, in order to determine compliance with this part 9 and part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as amended.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 330, § 4, effective July 1.

11-51-908. Confidentiality of information.

Financial information and the identities of participating local governments in the possession of, filed with, or obtained by the securities commissioner under this part 9 shall be confidential. No such information may be disclosed by the securities commissioner or any of the officers or employees of the division of securities except in connection with any investigation or proceeding or with the consent of the board of trustees of the local government investment pool trust fund to which such information pertains. Such information shall be construed as information within the meaning of section 24-72-204 (3)(a)(IV), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 331, § 4, effective July 1.